Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1381
Submission
to mediator; selection of mediator.

If the parties
in labor contract negotiations do not reach a voluntary agreement by January
1, the dispute shall be submitted to a mediator mutually selected by the parties
or appointed by the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service. Mediation
may continue indefinitely at the request of either party or when appropriate
in the judgment of the mediator. If necessary,
mediation may continue after the exchange of final offers.

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB397, § 26.